Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.130

Defenses to prosecution.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The good faith judgment of a physician, physician assistant, *advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice as to viability of the fetus or as to the risk to life or health of a pregnant individual and the good faith judgment of a health care provider as to the duration of pregnancy shall be a defense in any proceeding in which a violation of this chapter is an issue.

[2022 c 65 s 4; 1992 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 120, approved November 5, 1991).]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Legislative affirmation—2022 c 65: See note following RCW 9.02.100.